Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.130

Combination of vehicles.

"Combination of vehicles" means every combination of motor vehicle and motor vehicle, motor vehicle and trailer or motor vehicle and semitrailer.

[ 1963 c 154 s 26; 1961 c 12 s 46.04.130. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 14; prior: (i) 1943 c 153 s 1, part; 1937 c 188 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6312-1, part. (ii) 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1963 c 154: See note following RCW 46.37.010.